Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB335.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Day-Care Center Protection Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The indoor and outdoor environmental quality of child day-care centers can adversely affect children's academic performance and increase risk of both short-term and long-term health problems.(2) Child day-care centers are often operated independently, while public schools are frequently part of a 12345678910111213141516171819 school district with centralized facilities management.(3) The Commonwealth has a responsibility to ensure that child day-care centers, specifically those that are housed in facilities constructed prior to 1979 or facilities that have been previously utilized for an industrial or other high-hazard purpose, are safe for our children.(4) The Commonwealth must take steps to protect the health and safety of our most vulnerable residents by requiring indoor contamination assessment certifications and environmental quality certifications of child day-care centers.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child day care." Child care in lieu of parental care given for part of the 24-hour day to a child under 16 years of age, away from the child's home. The term does not include child day care furnished in places of worship during religious services."Child day-care center." A premises operated for profit in which child day care is provided simultaneously for seven or more children who are not relatives of the operator, except centers operated under social service auspices."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Hazardous substance." An element, compound or material which is any of the following:(1) Regulated as a hazardous air pollutant under section 6.6 of the act of January 8, 1960 (1959 P.L.2119, No.787), known as the Air Pollution Control Act.(2) Defined as hazardous waste under section 103 of the 20250HB0335PN0290 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act.(3) Regulated under the act of December 7, 1990 (P.L.639, No.165), known as the Hazardous Material Emergency Planning and Response Act."High-hazard business." A business utilizing hazardous substances, including:(1) Nail salons.(2) Dry cleaning facilities.(3) Gasoline stations.(4) Funeral homes.Section 4. Child day-care center requirements.(a) Duties.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a person seeking licensure to operate a child day-care center in this Commonwealth shall do the following prior to being licensed as a child day-care center under Article X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code:(1) Obtain written certification from the municipality in which the proposed child day-care center will be located indicating whether the building, structure or property was previously utilized or occupied by a high-hazard business.(2) Obtain an indoor contamination assessment certification from the department if the certification under paragraph (1) indicates that the property was previously utilized or occupied by a high-hazard business.(3) Obtain an environmental quality certification from the Department of Environmental Protection indicating that the property has been remediated consistent with the act of May 19, 1995 (P.L.4, No.2), known as the Land Recycling and Environmental Remediation Standards Act, if the certification 20250HB0335PN0290 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under paragraph (1) indicates that the property was previously utilized or occupied by a high-hazard business.(b) Exception.--A child day-care center which is currently operational and licensed under Article X of the Human Services Code shall not be required to obtain the certifications required under subsection (a).Section 5. Licensure denial and suspension.If a child day-care center fails to obtain the certifications required under section 4, the Department of Human Services shall deny the application of the person seeking licensure to operate a child day-care center until all certifications required under this act have been completed and submitted to the Department of Human Services.Section 6. Penalties.(a) Penalty.--A person seeking licensure that violates this act or any regulation promulgated in accordance with this act or knowingly makes a false statement, misrepresentation or certification in any application, record or other document filed or required to be maintained under this act may be assessed a fine of not more than $25,000 for a first offense and not more than $50,000 for a second or subsequent offense.(b) Continuing violations.--Each day that a violation continues constitutes an additional, separate and distinct offense.Section 7. Child Day-Care Center Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Child Day-Care Center Grant Program is established in the Department of Environmental Protection.(b) Purposes.--The Child Day-Care Center Grant Program shall use money appropriated through the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund to assist the department, the Department of Environmental 20250HB0335PN0290 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Protection and the Department of Human Services to offset the cost of inspection, testing and certification required under this act.Section 8. Regulations.The department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Human Services, shall promulgate regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0335PN0290 - 5 - 12345678910